da: Kompatibel saddeltype: Australian Stock; Barrel Racing; Dressur; Distance; Engelsk; Military; Spring; Roper; Western; Andet
cs: Kompatibilní typ sedla: Australské; Barrel racing; Drezurní; Vytrvalostní; Anglické; Všestrannostní; Skokové; Ropingové; Westernové; Jiné
ru: Совместимый тип седла: Австралийское; Для баррел-рейсинга; Выездковое; Для пробегов; Английское; Троеборное; Конкурное; Для роупинга; Вестерн; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de sela compatível: Australiana; Corrida de tambores; Ensino; Resistência; Inglesa; Concurso completo; Saltos; Laço; Western; Outra
zh-CN: 适用马鞍类型: 澳洲牧牛鞍; 绕桶赛马鞍; 盛装舞步马鞍; 耐力赛马鞍; 英式马鞍; 三项赛马鞍; 场地障碍马鞍; 套牛马鞍; 西部马鞍; 其他
it: Tipo di sella compatibile: Australiana; Barrel racing; Dressage; Endurance; Inglese; Concorso completo; Salto ostacoli; Roper; Western; Altro
el: Συμβατός τύπος σέλας: Αυστραλιανή stock; Αγώνων βαρελιών; Ντρεσάζ; Αντοχής; Αγγλικού τύπου; Ιππικού τριάθλου; Υπερπήδησης εμποδίων; Roper; Γουέστερν; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de sela compatível: Australiana; Três tambores; Adestramento; Enduro; Inglesa; CCE (Concurso Completo de Equitação); Salto; Laço; Western; Outro
th: ประเภทอานที่เข้ากันได้: ออสเตรเลียนสต็อก; แบร์เรลเรซซิง; เดรสสาจ; เอ็นดูแรนซ์; อังกฤษ; อีเวนติ้ง; กระโดด; โรเปอร์; เวสเทิร์น; อื่นๆ
tr: Uyumlu eyer tipi: Avustralya Stock; Varil yarışı; Dresaj; Dayanıklılık; İngiliz; Eventing; Engel atlama; Roper; Western; Diğer
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta sedla: Australsko; Barrel racing; Dresurno; Endurance; Englesko; Svestrano (eventing); Preponsko; Roper; Western; Ostalo
en: Compatible saddle type: Australian Stock; Barrel Racing; Dressage; Endurance; English; Eventing; Jumping; Roper; Western; Other
ko: 호환 안장 유형: 오스트레일리안 스톡; 배럴 레이싱; 마장마술; 엔듀런스; 잉글리시; 종합마술; 점핑; 로퍼; 웨스턴; 기타
hu: Kompatibilis nyeregtípus: Ausztrál stock; Hordókerülő; Díjlovagló; Távlovagló; Angol; Military; Ugró; Lasszózó; Western; Egyéb
de: Kompatibler Satteltyp: Australischer Stocksattel; Barrel-Racing-Sattel; Dressursattel; Distanzsattel; Englischer Sattel; Vielseitigkeitssattel; Springsattel; Roping-Sattel; Westernsattel; Sonstige
bg-BG: Съвместим стил седло: Австралийско работно; Барел рейсинг; Обездка; Ендюранс; Английско; Всестранна езда; Прескачане; За улавяне с ласо; Уестърн; Друг
fr: Type de selle compatible: Selle australienne; Course de barils; Dressage; Endurance; Anglaise; Concours complet; Saut d’obstacles; Roping; Western; Autre
ja: 対応サドルタイプ: オーストラリアンストック; バレルレーシング; 馬場馬術; エンデュランス; イングリッシュ; 総合馬術; 障害飛越; ローパー; ウェスタン; その他
zh-TW: 相容座墊類型: 澳洲牧羊馬鞍; 繞桶馬鞍; 馬場馬術馬鞍; 耐力馬鞍; 英式馬鞍; 三日賽馬鞍; 障礙超越馬鞍; 套索馬鞍; 西部馬鞍; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ sedla: Austrálske; Barelové; Drezúrne; Vytrvalostné; Anglické; Všestranné; Skokové; Lasárske; Westernové; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de șa compatibilă: Australian Stock; Barrel Racing; Dresaj; Anduranță; Englezească; Proba completă (Eventing); Sărituri; Roper; Western; Altele
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo balnas: Australiškas; „Barrel Racing“; Dailiojo jojimo; Ištvermės jojimo; Angliškas; Trikovės; Konkūro; „Roper“; Vesterniškas; Kita
sv: Kompatibel sadeltyp: Australisk stock; Barrel racing; Dressyr; Distansritt; Engelsk; Fälttävlan; Hoppning; Roping; Western; Övrigt
nl: Compatibel type zadel: Australisch stockzadel; Barrelracing; Dressuur; Endurance; Engels; Eventing; Springen; Roping; Western; Overige
es: Tipo de montura compatible: Australiana; Carreras de barriles; Doma clásica; Resistencia; Inglesa; Concurso completo; Salto; Lazo; Western; Otro
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta sedla: Avstralsko; Barrel racing; Dresurno; Vzdržljivostno; Angleško; Vsestransko; Skakalno; Roper; Western; Drugo
fi: Yhteensopiva satulatyyppi: Australialainen karjasatula; Tynnyriratsastus; Kouluratsastus; Matkaratsastus; Englantilainen; Kenttäratsastus; Esteratsastus; Lännenratsastus (Roper); Lännenratsastus; Muu
pl: Zgodny typ siodła: Siodło australijskie; Barrel Racing; Ujeżdżeniowe; Rajdowe; Klasyczne (angielskie); Wszechstronne (WKKW); Skokowe; Roper; Western; Inne
nb: Kompatibel saltype: Australsk stock-sal; Barrel racing; Dressur; Distanse; Engelsk; Feltritt; Sprang; Roper; Western; Annet
vi: Loại yên ngựa tương thích: Yên ngựa Úc; Yên đua thùng; Yên biểu diễn; Yên đua đường trường; Yên kiểu Anh; Yên đa năng (Eventing); Yên nhảy sào; Yên bắt bò; Yên viễn tây; Khác